Wisconsin, session 2025, SB643.
do enact as follows:SB643,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB643,1,44(1) Audit of specified residential buildings.SB643,2,51(a) Definition. In this subsection, “specified residential building” means an 2apartment building, rowhouse, town house, or condominium that consists of 8 or 3more attached dwelling units, as defined in s. 101.61 (1), and that has a dwelling 4unit located 2 or more stories above grade plane in height. “Specified residential 5building” does not include a facility licensed under ch. 50.SB643,2,126(b) Audit required. The department of safety and professional services shall 7perform an audit to determine whether automatic fire sprinkler systems, as 8defined in s. 145.01 (2), are installed on specified residential buildings. The 9department of safety and professional services shall submit a report on the audit 10under this paragraph to the governor, the chief clerk of each house of the 11legislature, and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 1213.172 (3) by September 30, 2026.SB643,213Section 2. Fiscal changes.SB643,2,2314(1) Project positions for audit. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 15appropriation to the department of safety and professional services under s. 20.165 16(2) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $75,000 to increase 17the authorized FTE positions for the department by 2.0 GPR project positions for 18the period beginning on the effective date of this subsection and ending on June 30, 192027, for the purpose of performing the audit required under Section 1 (1) (b) of 20this act. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 21of safety and professional services under s. 20.165 (2) (a), the dollar amount for 22fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $75,000 to provide funding for the project 23positions authorized under this subsection.SB643,2,2424